Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.030

Students taught in English language—Exception.

All students in the common schools of the state of Washington shall be taught in the English language: PROVIDED, That nothing in this section shall preclude the teaching of students in a language other than English when such instruction will aid the educational advancement of the student.

[ 1969 c 71 s 4. Formerly RCW 28A.05.015.]